Utah statutes.
49-20-104.   Creation of fund.
(1)  There is created the "Public Employees' Trust Fund" for the purpose of
paying the benefits and the costs of administering this program.
(2)  The fund shall consist of all money and interest paid into it in
accordance with this chapter, whether in the form of cash, securities, or
other assets, and of all money received from any other source.
(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by
Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.
